turku-src/affixes/verbs.lexc
!Verbs

LEXICON V1 
+V1:0 AfterV1 ;

LEXICON V1-CV 
+V1:0 AfterV1-CV ;

LEXICON V1-(j) 
+V1:0 AfterV1-(j) ;

LEXICON V1-j
+V1:0 AfterV1-j ;

LEXICON V1-Polysyll 
+V1:0 AfterV1-Polysyll ;

LEXICON V1-nl 
+V1:0 AfterV1-nl ;

LEXICON V1-nlPolysyll 
+V1:0 AfterV1-nlPolysyll ;

LEXICON V1-InitV 
+V1:0 AfterV1-InitV ;

LEXICON V1-InitC 
+V1:0 AfterV1-InitC ;

LEXICON V2
+V2:0 AfterV2 ;

LEXICON V2-je 
+V2:0 AfterV2-je ;

LEXICON V2-j
+V2:0 AfterV2-j ;

LEXICON V2-jy
+V2:0 AfterV2-jy ;

LEXICON V2-(C)V
+V2:0 AfterV2-(C)V ;

LEXICON V2-(C)V^E
+V2:0 AfterV2-(C)V^E ;





!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!! (6) BRANCHING INTO THE SUFFIX LEXICONS !!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
!----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON AfterV1 
  Vx-CoNeg ; 
  V1x-Pres ; 
  V1x-Pret1SgPl3 ; 
  V1x-Pret1Pl12 ;
  V1x-Pret2 ;
  Vx-ImpSg2 ; 
  Vx-ImpSg3Pl ;
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-Inf ; 
  Vx-InfNec ; 
  Vx-Ptc ; 
  Vx-Ger ; 
  Vx-GerInstr-y ;

LEXICON AfterV1-CV 
  Vx-CoNeg ; 
  V1x-Pres-e ; 
  V1x-Pret1SgPl3 ; V1x-Pret1Pl12 ;
  V1x-Pret2 ;
  Vx-ImpSg2 ; Vx-ImpSg3Pl ;
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-Inf ; Vx-InfNec ; Vx-Ptc ; Vx-Ger ; Vx-GerInstr-y ;

LEXICON AfterV1-(j)  !These verbs are completely regular. The two suffix lexicons are
                                !needed for orthographical reasons
  V1x-PresSg-j ;  

LEXICON AfterV1-j   !These verbs are completely regular. The two suffix lexicons are
                                !needed for orthographical reasons
  Vx-CoNeg ; 
  V1x-PresPl-j ;
  V1x-Pret1SgPl3 ; V1x-Pret1Pl12 ;
  V1x-Pret2 ; 
  Vx-ImpSg2 ; Vx-ImpSg3Pl ;
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-Inf ; Vx-InfNec ; Vx-Ptc ; Vx-Ger ; Vx-GerInstr-y ;

LEXICON AfterV1-Polysyll 
  Vx-CoNeg ; 
  V1x-Pres ; 
  V1x-Pret1SgPl3 ; V1x-Pret1Pl12 ;
  V1x-Pret2 ;
  Vx-ImpSg2 ; Vx-ImpSg3Pl ;
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-Inf ; Vx-InfNec ; Vx-Ptc ; Vx-Ger ; Vx-GerInstr-y ; Vx-GerInstr-0 ;

LEXICON AfterV1-nl 
  Vx-CoNeg ; 
  V1x-Pres ; 
  V1x-PalatMark ; V1x-Pret1Pl12 ; 
  V1x-Pret2 ;
  Vx-ImpSg2 ; Vx-ImpSg3Pl ;
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-Inf ; Vx-InfNec ; Vx-Ptc ; Vx-Ger ; Vx-GerInstr-y ;

LEXICON AfterV1-nlPolysyll 
  Vx-CoNeg ; 
  V1x-Pres ; 
  V1x-PalatMark ; V1x-Pret1Pl12 ; 
  V1x-Pret2 ;
  Vx-ImpSg2 ; Vx-ImpSg3Pl ;
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-Inf ; Vx-InfNec ; Vx-Ptc ; Vx-Ger ; Vx-GerInstr-y ; Vx-GerInstr-0 ;

LEXICON AfterV1-InitV 
  V1x-Pres ; V1x-Pret1SgPl3 ; V1x-Pret2 ; 
  Vx-Inf ; Vx-GerInstr-y ;

LEXICON AfterV1-InitC 
  Vx-CoNeg ; V1x-Pret1Pl12 ; Vx-ImpSg2 ;  Vx-ImpSg3Pl ; Vx-Des ; 
  Vx-InfNec ; Vx-Ptc ; Vx-Ger ; 

LEXICON AfterV2 
  Vx-CoNeg ; 
  V2x-Pres ; 
  V2x-Pret1 ; 
  V2x-Pret2 ; 
  Vx-ImpSg2 ; 
  Vx-ImpSg3Pl  ;
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-Inf ; 
  Vx-InfNec ; 
  Vx-Ptc ; 
  Vx-Ger ; 
  Vx-GerInstr-je ;

LEXICON AfterV2-je 
  Vx-CoNeg ; 
  V2x-Pres-j ; 
  V2x-Pret2 ; 
  Vx-ImpSg2 ; 
  Vx-Inf-j ; Vx-GerInstr-je ; 

!Consonant stems used in the older othography, see AA85, 105-06 footnote.
!The model produces forms based on cons. stems of all the VjV-type verbs.
!It is not clear if all the cons. stem based forms have actually occurred in
!the written language.
LEXICON AfterV2-j 
  Vx-CoNeg ; 
  Vx-ImpSg2 ; 
!The following represent the exceptional old orthography forms, s. AA85:
! 105-106 footnote:
  Vx-ImpSg3Pl ;
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-InfNec ; Vx-Ptc ; Vx-Ger ;

LEXICON AfterV2-jy 
  V2x-Pret1; 
  Vx-ImpSg3Pl ; 
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-InfNec ; 
  Vx-Ptc ; 
  Vx-Ger ;

LEXICON AfterV2-(C)V^E  
  V2x-Pres-e ;                 
  V2x-Pret1 ;
  V2x-Pret2-e ;
  Vx-ImpSg3Pl ;
  Vx-Des ;
  Vx-Inf ; Vx-InfNec ; Vx-Ptc ; Vx-Ger ; Vx-GerInstr-e ;

LEXICON AfterV2-(C)V  !The shorter variant (C)V only in two categories
  Vx-CoNeg ;                  
  Vx-ImpSg2 ;
!----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON AfterVxPers  !From Pret1 no cont.; to be added later, if cases encountered
  Enc-at ; !The func. of at here is that of a conjunction; at might not appear in all tenses, 
              !the continuation may thus be overproductive; ak to be added when encountered
  Enc-la ; Enc-laj ; Enc-ogyla ;  !ogyla probably not used in Pret1? For the 
                                                            !time being there is no cont. to this lex. 
                                                            !from Pret1 forms.
  Enc-ys ; !The distributional difference with -s somewhat unclear; if -s is the variant after
               !vowels, e.g., +Ind+Pres+Pl12 and +Ind+Pret2+Pl12 should have -s.
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVxImp
 Enc-ja_jan ;
 WordEnd ;

! Infiniittimuotojen kontinuaatioita koodatessa on aina pantu kont. kaikkiin 
! px:ihin, vaikka esimerkeissä olisi tavattu vain jokin niistä. Näin ollen 
! malli voi olla yliproduktiivinen px:ien liittymisen osalta. Sen sijaan 
! sijoista on merkitty vain ne, jotka todella ovat esiintyneet esimerkeissä.
! Kontinuaatiot ovat todennäköisesti myös muutenkin yliprodusoivia, sillä
! possessiivisuffikseista ja sijoista on normaalit, tavallisten nominien
! kontinuaatiot, vaikka ilmeisesti vain osa näistä on todellisuudessa 
! kielessä esiintyviä muotoja. Käytännöllinen tapa rajoittaa produktiivi-
! suutta olisi luoda oma sarja px:ja verbimuodoille, mutta tämä johtaisi
! periaatteellisiin ongelmiin, koska kysymys on kuitenkin samoista pos-
! sessiivisuffikseista kuin nomineillakin. Lippudiakriitein tapahtuva pro-
! duktiivisuuden rajoittaminen vaatisi suuren määrän diakriittejä, koska
! tietty suffiksi voi esiintyä tietyn infiniittimuodon kanssa, mutta toinen
! läheinen infiniittimuoto taas ei. Sääntösysteemiin liittyy iherentisti
! rajoittamiaton produktiivisuus, jonka käytännön rajoittaminen on vaikeaa.
! Lisälähde (9.5.05): Bereczki 2002: A cseremisz nyelv történeti alaktana, s. 117- 
! (sijasuffiksillisia infiniittimuotoja; tarkistettava, että kaikki Bereczkin
! esittämät muodot analysoituvat mallissa). 

LEXICON AfterVx-Inf
 Cx-Dat ; 
 Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-yzhe ; Px-Pl ; 
 Enc-ak ; Enc-at ;
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-InfNec
 Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-s ;
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-PtcAct
 Cx-Gen ; Cx-Acc ; Cx-Dat ; !Only one, not fully understood ex. of Gen
 Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zhe ; Px-Sg3-zh ; Px-Pl ; 
 Enc-at ; !at is based on some unclear examples, must be checked
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-PtcPas
 Cx-Acc ; Cx-Dat ; Cx-Mod ; !Check that there are real modals, not only mYla
                                          !gerunds.
 Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zhe ; Px-Sg3-zh ; Px-Pl ; 
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-PtcFut
 Cx-Acc ; Cx-Dat ; Cx-Ill ; Cx-Mod ; 
 Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-yzhe ; Px-Sg3-zh ; Px-Pl ; 
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-PtcNeg
 Cx-Acc ; Cx-Gen ; Cx-Dat ; Cx-Ill ; Cx-Mod ; 
 Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zhe ;Px-Sg3-zh ; Px-Pl ; 
 Pl-sh_w ; !Only vlak attested
 Cmp ;
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-GerNeg
 Px-Sg12-NOe ; Px-Sg3-zhe ; Px-Pl ; 
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-GerAnt
 Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zhe ; Px-Pl ; 
 Enc-ak ; Enc-at ;
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-GerPost
 Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zhe ; Px-Pl ; 
 Enc-ak ; Enc-at ;
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-GerPost-short
 Enc-at ;
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterVx-GerSim-syn
 Enc-ak ;
 WordEnd ;

!Not all pxs have been attested in GerSim gerunds; may be overproductive
LEXICON AfterVx-GerSim-sy-
 Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zh ; Px-Pl ; 
 Vx-GerSim-la ;

LEXICON AfterVx-GerSim-my-
 Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zh ; Px-Pl ; 
 Vx-GerSim-la ;

LEXICON AfterVx-GerSim-la
 Px-Sg12-NOe ; Px-Sg3-zhe ; Px-Pl ; 
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterEnc-ak 
 Enc-la ;
 WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterEnc-at  
 Enc-laj ;
 WordEnd ;








!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!! (7) LEXICONS CONTAINING THE SUFFIXES !!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!Huom! Kaikkien suffiksien eteen pitää panna 
!!!junktuurisymboli $, jotta morfofonologiset 
!!!säännöt toimisivat oikein.

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON Vx-CoNeg
+CoNeg:0 WordEnd ;

LEXICON V1x-Pres
+Ind+Pres+Sg1:$ам AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg2:$ат AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg3:$еш AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl1:$ына AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl2:$ыда AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl3:$ыт AfterVxPers ;

LEXICON V1x-Pres-e
+Ind+Pres+Sg1:$ам AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg2:$ат AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg3:$эш AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl1:$ына AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl2:$ыда AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl3:$ыт AfterVxPers ;

LEXICON V1x-PresSg-j  !This is motivated only for the orthography
+Ind+Pres+Sg1:$ям AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg2:$ят AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg3:$еш AfterVxPers ;

LEXICON V1x-PresPl-j !This is motivated only for the orthography
+Ind+Pres+Pl1:$ына AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl2:$ыда AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl3:$ыт AfterVxPers ;

LEXICON V2x-Pres
+Ind+Pres+Sg1:$ем AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg2:$ет AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg3:$а AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl1:$ена AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl2:$еда AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl3:$ат AfterVxPers ;

LEXICON V2x-Pres-j
+Ind+Pres+Sg1:$ем AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg2:$ет AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg3:$я AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl1:$ена AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl2:$еда AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl3:$ят AfterVxPers ;

LEXICON V2x-Pres-e     !For (C)V monosyllabic 2. conj. verbs; orthography requires this
+Ind+Pres+Sg1:$эм AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg2:$эт AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Sg3:$а AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl1:$эна AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl2:$эда AfterVxPers ;
+Ind+Pres+Pl3:$ат AfterVxPers ;

LEXICON V1x-Pret1SgPl3
+Ind+Pret1+Sg1:$ым WordEnd ;
+Ind+Pret1+Sg2:$ыч WordEnd ;
+Ind+Pret1+Sg3:$^E WordEnd ;
+Ind+Pret1+Pl3:$ыч WordEnd ;

LEXICON V1x-PalatMark
0:ь V1x-Pret1SgPl3 ;

LEXICON V1x-Pret1Pl12 
+Ind+Pret1+Pl1:$на WordEnd ;
+Ind+Pret1+Pl2:$да WordEnd ;

LEXICON V2x-Pret1
+Ind+Pret1:$ш V2x-Pret1Pers ; 

LEXICON V2x-Pret1Pers
+Sg1:$ым WordEnd ;
+Sg2:$ыч WordEnd ;
+Sg3:0 WordEnd ;
+Pl1:$на WordEnd ;
+Pl2:$да WordEnd ;
+Pl3:$т WordEnd ;

LEXICON V1x-Pret2
+Ind+Pret2:$ын Vx-Pret2Pers ;

LEXICON V2x-Pret2
+Ind+Pret2:$ен Vx-Pret2Pers ;

LEXICON V2x-Pret2-e   !For (C)V monosyllabic 2. conj. verbs
+Ind+Pret2:$эн Vx-Pret2Pers ;

LEXICON Vx-Pret2Pers
+Sg1:$ам AfterVxPers ;
+Sg2:$ат AfterVxPers ;
+Sg3:0 AfterVxPers ;
+Pl1:$на AfterVxPers ;
+Pl2:$да AfterVxPers ;
+Pl3:$ыт AfterVxPers ;

LEXICON Vx-ImpSg2  !Sg Sx must be in a separate lexicon because (C)V type 
                                  !V2 verbs
+Imp+Sg2:0 AfterVxImp ;

LEXICON Vx-ImpSg3Pl
+Imp+Sg3:$ж^E WordEnd ;
+Imp+Pl2:$за AfterVxImp ;
+Imp+Pl3:$VEPшт WordEnd ; !VEP needed for 1. conjugation

LEXICON Vx-Des
+Des+Pres:$не Vx-DesPers ; !VEP tarpeen; pantu ka^E/kaj-
                                                   !tyypin takia?

LEXICON Vx-DesPers 
+Sg1:$м WordEnd ;
+Sg2:$т WordEnd ;
+Sg3:$ж^E WordEnd ;
+Pl1:$на WordEnd ;
+Pl2:$да WordEnd ;
+Pl3:$шт WordEnd ;

! @P.VERB.PRESENT@ used only to prevent the accusative inter-
!pretation of the PxSg1 like form. The flag diacritic could thus be
!deleted in most cases. Check the current usage before doing that!
LEXICON Vx-Inf  !Division into  infinitive lexicons: initial
                          !V/C in -InitV/-InitC type cont. classes
< "+Inf":[%$ а ш]  "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterVx-Inf ;

LEXICON Vx-Inf-j  
< "+Inf":[%$ я ш]  "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterVx-Inf ;

LEXICON Vx-InfNec
+Inf+Nec:$ман AfterVx-InfNec ;

LEXICON Vx-Ptc
< "+Ptc+Act":[%$ ш %^E] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterVx-PtcAct ;
< "+Ptc+Pas":[%$ м %^E] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterVx-PtcPas ;
< "+Ptc+Fut":[%$ ш а ш] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterVx-PtcFut ;
< "+Ptc+Neg":[%$ д ы м %^E] "@P.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterVx-PtcNeg ;
